Washington statutes.
RCW 36.92.060

Appointment of assistants.

The supervisor shall have the authority to appoint, subject to the approval of the board, such clerical and other assistants as may be required and authorized for the proper discharge of the functions of the services department.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 103 s 7.]